Arkansas, session 2025, HB1598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A change in the assessment system for public schools and
public school districts in Arkansas was necessary to align with the
educational priorities established by Acts 2023, No. 237, also known as the
"LEARNS Act";
(2) The development of a revised accountability system that
includes the new assessment system and better meets the needs of Arkansas
students is currently in progress; and
(3) A pause in new letter grade designations for the 2023-2024
and 2024-2025 school years under the existing school rating system will allow
the collection of necessary data to provide accurate and reliable
*TNL243*
03-17-2025 12:25:41 TNL243

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 HB1598
accountability information, which is essential for Arkansans to make informed
decisions regarding their children's education.
(b) The Department of Education shall not assign to public schools new
school ratings calculated under the current school rating system under § 6-
15-2105 for the 2023-2024 school year.
(c) The department shall:
(1) Establish a new accountability system; and
(2)(A) Issue all public schools, including open-enrollment
public charter schools, a letter grade for the 2024-2025 school year using
the new accountability system established under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section.
(B)(i) If a public school or an open-enrollment public
charter school does not improve or maintain its most recent letter grade
under the new accountability system established under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section, then the public school or open-enrollment public charter school
may request a review by the Division of Public School Accountability.
(ii) The division shall review all applicable data
and information upon receipt of a request from a public school or an open-
enrollment public charter school under subdivision (c)(2)(B)(i) of this
section and make a determination regarding the public school's or open-
enrollment public charter school's letter grade.
(e) This section shall expire on June 30, 2026.

/s/Brooks












03-17-2025 12:25:41 TNL243